Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-604
University of Nebraska or community college; governing body; rules and regulations; adopt.

Each governing body shall adopt rules and regulations for the administration of sections 85-601 to 85-605.

Laws 1971, LB 445, § 4;

Laws 2023, LB705, § 115.